sources/apertium/apertium-en-ca.en-ca-smaller.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 35125
	Sdefs: 89
	Paradigms: 15
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix -standard apertium-en-ca.en-ca.dix foo
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="adjant" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="pres" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pprs" /> 
    <sdef n="subs" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="past" /> 
    <sdef n="subj" /> 
    <sdef n="obj" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" /> 
    <sdef n="sint" /> 
    <sdef n="unc" /> 
    <sdef n="sep" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
    <sdef n="percent" /> 
    <sdef n="mon" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="Abc">
    <e>
      <re>[ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ][ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz]*</re>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="two__num">
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>-cent<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>-cent<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>-cent<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="two(1)__num">
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="three__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>-cent<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>-cent<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>-cent<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="three(1)__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="num"/></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="twenty__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r></r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-one</l>
        <r>-un</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-two</l>
        <r>-dos</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-three</l>
        <r>-tres</r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-four</l>
        <r>-quatre</r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-five</l>
        <r>-cinc</r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-six</l>
        <r>-sis</r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-seven</l>
        <r>-set</r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-eight</l>
        <r>-vuit</r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-nine</l>
        <r>-nou</r>
      </p>
        <par n="three(1)__num"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="one__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>cent<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand<s n="num"/></l>
        <r>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="one__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>eight</l><r>vuit</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>eighty</l><r>vuitanta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>fifty</l><r>cinquanta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>five</l><r>cinc</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>forty</l><r>quaranta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>four</l><r>quatre</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>nine</l><r>nou</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ninety</l><r>noranta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>one</l><r></r></p><par n="one__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>seven</l><r>set</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>seventy</l><r>setanta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>six</l><r>sis</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>sixty</l><r>seixanta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>thirty</l><r>trenta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>three</l><r>tres</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>twenty</l><r>vint</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>two</l><r>dos</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Dr.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Dr.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Dr<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Dr<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Miss.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Miss.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Miss<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Miss<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mr.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mr.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mr<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mr<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mrs.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mrs.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mrs<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Mrs<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Ms.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Ms.<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Ms<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>Ms<b/></l><r>pn000</r></p><par n="Abc"/><i><b/></i><par n="Abc"/><i><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
